Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2232
Nursing program; application.

An institution desiring to conduct a program of nursing shall apply to the board and submit evidence to the board that it is prepared to carry out the prescribed basic nursing curriculum and to meet the other standards established by the Nurse Practice Act and by the board.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 15(1), p. 843;

Laws 1955, c. 272, § 6, p. 858;

Laws 1980, LB 847, § 10;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 24;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 27;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.24;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 788.